Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-518
Insurance requirements.

Nothing in the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding insurance.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 18.